Colorado, session 2026A, HB1333.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$76,394,609 is appropriated to the legislative department. This
appropriation consists of $74,607,929 from the general fund, $5,000 from
cash funds, and $1,781,680 from reappropriated funds. The legislative
department may use this appropriation as follows:
(a) $25,550,358 for use by the general assembly, which amount:
(I) Consists of $25,545,358 from the general fund and $5,000 from
cash funds generated from the sale of bill boxes, legislative directories, and
publications and other services provided by the print shop; and
(II) Is based on the assumption that the general assembly will have
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

173.4 FTE;
(b) $14,265,042 for use by the office of the state auditor, which
amount:
(I) Consists of $12,624,362 from the general fund and $1,640,680
from reappropriated funds received from various departments for audits;
and
(II) Is based on the assumption that the office of the state auditor
will have 83.1 FTE;
(c) $3,072,666 for use by the joint budget committee, which amount
is:
(I) From the general fund; and
(II) Based on the assumption that the joint budget committee will
have 19.7 FTE;
(d) $17,836,918 for use by the legislative council, which amount:
(I) Consists of $17,695,918 from the general fund and $141,000
from reappropriated funds received from the general assembly pursuant to
section 24-70-203 (1)(a), C.R.S.; and
(II) Is based on the assumption that the legislative council will have
109.6 FTE;
(e) $10,991,239 for use by the committee on legal services, which
amount is:
(I) From the general fund; and
(II) Based on the assumption that the committee on legal services
will have 64.8 FTE; and
(f) $4,678,386 from the general fund for the PERA Amortization
Equalization Disbursement and PERA Supplemental Amortization
Equalization Disbursement.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1333

(2) The general assembly anticipates that, during the 2026-27 state
fiscal year, the tax levy on civil actions provided for in section 2-5-119,
C.R.S., will return approximately $203,077 to the general fund to offset
expenses of the revision of statutes by the office of legislative legal
services. This figure is included for informational purposes only.
SECTION 2. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$50,000 is appropriated to the youth advisory council cash fund created in
section 2-2-1306, C.R.S. This appropriation is from the general fund. The
legislative department is responsible for the accounting related to this
appropriation.
SECTION 3. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 1 of
chapter 450, (SB25-188), amend (1)(d) as follows:
Section 1. Appropriation. (1) For the 2025-26 state fiscal year,
$74,577,313 is appropriated to the legislative department. This
appropriation consists of $72,829,086 from the general fund, $5,000 from
cash funds, and $1,743,227 from reappropriated funds. The legislative
department may use this appropriation as follows:
(d) $17,384,445 for use by the legislative council, which amount:
(I) Consists of $17,243,445 from the general fund and $141,000
from reappropriated funds received from the general assembly pursuant to
section 24-70-203 (1)(a), C.R.S.; and
(II) Is based on the assumption that the legislative council will have
109.9 FTE; AND
(III) INCLUDES $30,000 FROM THE GENERAL FUND THAT, IF NOT
EXPENDED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, IS FURTHER APPROPRIATED TO THE
LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT FOR THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR FOR USE BY
THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL FOR NEW LEGISLATOR ORIENTATION AND
OFFICIAL FUNCTIONS;
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1333

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1333